Missouri, session 2026, HB2889.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 579.022, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 579.022, to read as follows:
579.022. 1. A person commits the offense of delivery of a controlled substance
causing death if a person delivers or distributes a controlled substance under section 579.020
[knowing such substance is mixed with another controlled substance] and a death results from
the use of such controlled substance.
2. It shall not be a defense that the user contributed to the user's own death by using
the controlled substance or consenting to the administration of the controlled substance by
another.
3. The offense of delivery of a controlled substance causing death is a class A felony.
4. For purposes of this section, "controlled substance" means a Schedule I or
Schedule II controlled substance, as defined in section 195.017.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.